Massachusetts, session 194th, H182.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The cannabis control commission, in consultation with the department of corrections,
the university of massachsuetts, and the executive office of housing and ecnomoic development
shall, shall (i) conduct a study on programs and partnerships to encourage the employment of
formerly incarcerated individuals in the cannabis industry, including trainings and educational
programs conductred within houses of correction, jails, priosons, and after release. and report the
findins of that study no later than Dec. 31, 2024 and (ii) develop a pilot program to create career
pathways in the cannabis industry for incarcerated and formerly incarcerated individuals.no later
than Dec. 31, 2025.
of 1